Arkansas, session 2025, SB465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-4-2705, concerning the job-creation tax
credit under the Consolidated Incentive Act of 2003, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(i) If a qualified business executes a financial incentive agreement
under this section and under § 15-4-2706 that concern the same project, the
financial incentive agreement executed under this section shall be executed
within twenty-four (24) months of the execution of the financial incentive
agreement under § 15-4-2706.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 15-4-2706(d), concerning state and local
sales and use tax refunds under the Consolidated Incentive Act of 2003, is
*JLL296*
03/14/2025 7:31:45 AM JLL296

SB465
amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(6)(A) For purposes of this subsection, a developer of a
speculative development project is a qualified business if the developer:
(i) Invests at least twenty-five million dollars
($25,000,000) in the speculative development project, including without
limitation the land, buildings, and equipment used in the speculative
development project; and
(ii) Meets the requirements stated for a qualified
business under subdivisions (d)(1)-(5) of this section.
(B) As used in this subdivision (d)(6), "speculative
development project" means the construction, development, or modernization of
a basic structure of flexible design that:
(i) Is erected for the eventual sale or lease to a
purchaser or tenant requiring appropriate facilities; and
(ii) Has at least one hundred thousand (100,000)
square feet of usable space.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 15-4-2706, concerning investment tax
credits under the Consolidated Incentive Act of 2003, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(f) If a qualified business executes a financial incentive agreement
under this section and under § 15-4-2705 or § 15-4-2707 that concern the same
project, the financial incentive agreement executed under this section shall
be executed within twenty-four (24) months of the execution of the financial
incentive agreement under § 15-4-2705 or § 15-4-2707.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 15-4-2707, concerning the Economic
Development Incentive Fund, is amended to add an additional subsection to
read as follows:
(f) If a qualified business executes a financial incentive agreement
under this section and under § 15-4-2706 that concern the same project, the
financial incentive agreement executed under this section shall be executed
within twenty-four (24) months of the execution of the financial incentive
agreement under § 15-4-2706.

SECTION 5. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1-4 of this act are effective on
03/14/2025 7:31:45 AM JLL296

SB465
and after October 1, 2025.



































03/14/2025 7:31:45 AM JLL296